Nebraska, session 109, LB128.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB128 LB128
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-426, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-426 The commission may investigate the cause of all accidents on
any railroad within this state that result in loss of life or injury to
any person or property. Upon the occurrence of any such serious personal
injury or loss of life to persons other than railroad employees resulting
from an accident at a railroad crossing or from an accident involving an
explosion, fire, or release of noxious fumes occurring upon any railroad
within the State of Nebraska, the corporation which operates the railroad
upon which the accident occurred shall report such accident in writing or
by telephone to the commission within twenty-four hours of the time such
accident occurred. The commission shall promptly investigate any such
accident and a report shall be made a part of the commission's official
files. The corporation which operates the railroad shall also furnish to
the commission a copy of the same report that it is required to furnish
to the Federal Railroad Administration. Neither of such reports shall be
evidence or referred to in any case in any court. Any railroad carrier
violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a
Class IV misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Original section 75-426, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-